Washington statutes.
RCW 20.01.060

Licensee in one class may obtain license in another—Additional fee.

Any person licensed as a commission merchant, dealer, or broker, in the manner prescribed in this chapter, may apply for and secure a license in any or all of the remaining such classifications upon payment of an additional fee of twenty-five dollars for each such additional classification: PROVIDED, That the applicant's principal license shall be in that classification requiring the greatest license fee. Such applicant shall further comply with those parts of this chapter regulating the licensing of the other particular classifications involved.

[ 1979 ex.s. c 115 s 4; 1977 ex.s. c 304 s 3; 1974 ex.s. c 102 s 4; 1971 ex.s. c 182 s 4; 1959 c 139 s 6.]